Utah statutes.
72-10-305.   Mutual assistance -- Gifts, leases, and loans.
(1)  If any public agency determines that the public interest and the interest
of the public agency will be served by assisting any other public agency in
exercising the powers and authority granted by this part, the public agency
may furnish assistance by gift of real or personal property or money or lease
or loan with or without charge or interest.
(2)  In appropriating the property or money and providing for the assistance
by taxation, the issuance of bonds, or other means, the public agency may
exercise all of its powers as though used for its own direct purposes as
provided in this part.
